Arkansas, session 2025, HB1523.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 12, Chapter 8, is amended to add an
additional subchapter to read as follows:
Subchapter 7 - Missing Persons Alert Systems

12-8-701. Arkansas Amber Alert System.
(a) There is established the Arkansas Amber Alert System to be
administered by the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(b) The division shall:
(1) Serve as the coordinating law enforcement agency to alert
the public of abducted children through the Arkansas Amber Alert System; and
(2) Establish the criteria for activation of the Arkansas Amber
Alert System.
*CEB152*
04-02-2025 13:33:09 CEB152

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S4/2/25 HB1523

12-8-702. Arkansas Silver Alert System.
(a) There is established the Arkansas Silver Alert System to be
administered by the Division of Arkansas State Police.
(b) The division shall:
(1) Serve as the coordinating law enforcement agency to
disseminate statewide alerts for missing seniors and adults with cognitive
disorders through the Arkansas Silver Alert System; and
(2) Establish the criteria for activation of the Arkansas Silver
Alert System.

12-8-703. Missing Endangered Adult Advisory System.
(a) There is established a standardized system to aid in the search of
missing adults to be known as the Missing Endangered Adult Advisory System.
(b) The Division of the Arkansas State Police shall serve as the
coordinating law enforcement agency to disseminate appropriate advisories
under the Missing Endangered Adult Advisory System.
(c)(1) The Missing Endangered Adult Advisory System shall be used for
a missing adult who does not meet the criteria for activation of the Arkansas
Silver Alert System who has:
(A) A mental or cognitive disability that is not
Alzheimer’s disease or a dementia-related disorder;
(B) An intellectual disability, developmental disability,
or brain injury; or
(C) Another physical, mental, or emotional disability that
is not related to substance abuse.
(2) The Missing Endangered Adult Advisory Stytem will not be
activated for a person who is determined to be suicidal.
(d) The Missing Endangered Adult Advisory System shall have safeguards
in place to ensure that activation of the Missing Endangered Adult Advisory
System:
(1) Is the only viable means by which the missing adult is
likely to be returned to safety;
(2) Provides for the protection of the privacy, dignity, and
independence of the missing adult;
(3) Prevents the inadvertent or unnecessary broadcasting or
04-02-2025 13:33:09 CEB152

As Engrossed: H2/20/25 S4/2/25 HB1523
dissemination of sensitive health information; and
(4) Only occurs when there is sufficient descriptive information
about the missing adult and the circumstances surrounding his or her
disappearance to indicate that activating an advisory is likely to help
locate the missing adult.
(e) The division shall:
(1) Establish the procedure for activation of the Missing
Endangered Adult Advisory System;
(2) Monitor the use, activation, and results of the Missing
Endangered Adult Advisory System; and
(3) Coordinate with local law enforcement to ensure the
appropriate use of the Missing Endangered Adult Advisory System.

12-8-704. Rulemaking.
The Department of Public Safety may promulgate rules to implement this
subchapter.

/s/Vaught


















04-02-2025 13:33:09 CEB152